src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_21_odd_oblique 
  +Sg          :^WG          sgpl_cases_odd ;
  +Sg          :^WG          gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por :             par_V          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:             par_A          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:             par_A          ;
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn       ;
  +Sg          :             ess_nnA        ;

  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i     gen_tten       ; ! kajaviitten ! TODO Why WG here and not it par?
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i        par_tA         ; ! kajaviita
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2%>i      par_end        ; ! %> i necessary, otherwise a:o NOTwork, kajavii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
!      +Pl+Ill:%^HMETA%>hii n_PxK          ;
  +Pl      :%^HMETA      ill_hiin       ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ; !Jok loistaava
  +Pl      :^WG^A0%>i2      sgpl_cases_odd ; ! TODO any cases here that should have ^AO?
! +Pl+Tra:%>i2%>ksi    PxxK           ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_u

+N         :  x_21_odd_u ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_u

  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nnA         ; ! paivukkonna
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         gen_tten        ;
 ! +Pl      :^AO%>i2            par_tA          ; ! TODO: saada selville jos tämä ryhmä saa -tA päätteen
   +Pl+Dial/Por      :%>i2            par_end          ; 
  +Pl      :^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;
!          +Pl:^AO%>i2            ill_hin         ; ! TODO, only for asioihin, not the others?
  +Pl      :%>i2            ess_nA          ; ! paivukoina
  +Pl      :%>i2            com_ne          ; ! paivukoine
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
!      +Pl+Ill:^AO^HMETA%>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
         !+Ill:         %>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
!+Ill:h%>i2%>i2     n_PxK ; ! on Sg:ssä hVVn


LEXICON x_21_even_u 

  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nA         ; ! paivukkonna
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_even  ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         gen_tten        ;
 ! +Pl      :^AO%>i2            par_tA          ; ! TODO: saada selville jos tämä ryhmä saa -tA päätteen
   +Pl+Dial/Por      :%>i2            par_end          ; 
  +Pl      :^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;
!          +Pl:^AO%>i2            ill_hin         ; ! TODO, only for asioihin, not the others?
  +Pl      :%>i2            ess_nA          ; ! paivukoina
  +Pl      :%>i2            com_ne          ; ! paivukoine
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
!      +Pl+Ill:^AO^HMETA%>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
         !+Ill:         %>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
!+Ill:h%>i2%>i2     n_PxK ; ! on Sg:ssä hVVn


LEXICON n_21_odd_ua

+N         :  x_21_odd_ua ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_ua !saipua, fierua ja luusua

  +Sg          :             nom_end              ;
  +Sg          :^WG          sgpl_cases_odd ;
  +Sg          :^WG          gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por :             par_V          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:             par_A          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:             par_A          ;
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn       ;
  +Sg          :             ess_nnA        ;

  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :^WG^A0%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! kajaviitten ! TODO Why WG here and not it par?
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por :^Por^A0%>i2        par_tA         ; ! kajaviita
  +Pl+Dial/Por :^Por^A0%>i2      par_end        ; ! %> i necessary, otherwise a:o NOTwork, kajavii
  !+Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
  !+Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
!      +Pl+Ill:%^HMETA%>hii n_PxK          ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA      ill_hVin       ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         com_nne        ; !Jok loistaava
  +Pl      :^WG^A0%>i2      sgpl_cases_odd ; ! TODO any cases here that should have ^AO?
! +Pl+Tra:%>i2%>ksi    PxxK           ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_AO !valinta> valinttoi. For the nouns that ends in -a and where the stem change to -o in plural, and also that have special gemination in pl par. We might have to change pl par for the same reason as in "perintö". 

+N         :  x_21_odd_AO ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_AO

+Sg:                    nom_R           ;
+Sg:                    nom_end         ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
!+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:       par_V           ;
!+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var       par_A           ;
!+Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok       par_A           ;
+Sg:^HMETA              ill_hVVn        ;
+Sg:                    ess_nA          ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
!+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG                 nom_t           ;
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG                 nom_t           ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2             gen_tten          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^AO%>i2             par_end         ;


!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^AO%>j              par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^AO%>j              par_A           ;
+Pl:^AO^HMETA                        ill_hVin        ; ! sykshyin
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          ess_nA          ;
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl






LEXICON n_21_odd_oi  ! For nouns that ends in -o and get special gemination in pl partitive and where only -i is added to the plural stem. We might have to change pl par when we find out is it "perinttöi, perintöitä or perinöitä". 

+N         :  x_21_odd_oi ;
