src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
veranta:veranta n_21_odd_AO ;
valinta:valinta n_21_odd_AO ;
luononhallinta:luonon#hallinta n_21_odd_AO ;
toiminta:toiminta n_21_odd_AO ;
maininta:maininta n_21_odd_AO ; 
luononvalvonta:luonon#valvonta n_21_odd_AO ;
saipua:saipua n_21_odd_ua ;
fierua:fierua n_21_odd_ua ;
luusua:luusua n_21_odd_ua ;
uimasuvanto:uima#suvanto n_21_odd_oi ;
lämminvesisuvanto:lämmin#vesi#suvanto n_21_odd_oi ;
suvanto:suvanto n_21_odd_oi ;
olento:olento n_21_odd_oi ;
komento:komento n_21_odd_oi ;
pitkesenkorento:pitkesen#korento n_21_odd_oi ;
korento:korento n_21_odd_oi ;
poronkurento:poron#kurento n_21_odd_oi ;
kurento:kurento n_21_odd_oi ;
ahvento:ahvento n_21_odd_oi ;
havainto:havainto n_21_odd_oi ;
kulttuuripalkinto:kulttuuri#palkinto n_21_odd_oi ;
palkinto:palkinto n_21_odd_oi ;
opinto:opinto n_21_odd_oi ;
ravinto:ravinto n_21_odd_oi ;
sovinto:sovinto n_21_odd_oi ;
uskonto:uskonto n_21_odd_oi ;
marasto:marasto n_21_odd_oi;
osasto:osasto n_21_odd_oi ;
taistelu:taistelu n_21_odd_u ;
palvelu:palvelu n_21_odd_u ;
arvelu:arvelu n_21_odd_u ;
kilppailu:kilppailu n_21_odd_u ;
ratkaisu:ratkaisu n_21_odd_u ;
raamattu:raamattu n_21_odd_u ;
röhtely:röhtely n_21_odd_u ;
kuvanäyttely:kuva#näyttely n_21_odd_u ;
kesänäyttely:kesä#näyttely n_21_odd_u ;
näyttely:näyttely n_21_odd_u ;
dokumenttiperintö:dokumentti#perintö n_21_odd_oi ;
perintö:perintö n_21_odd_oi ;
